District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1106.01

Conflict of interest.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 465, Pub. L. 93-376, title VI, § 601
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2178, Pub. L. 93-635, § 14(b)
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title II, § 202, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title I, § 102(b), title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205 (w), 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-58, § 2(b), 27 DCR 963
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(p), 29 DCR 458
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-184, § 2, 47 DCR 7066
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 6(b), 55 DCR 6758
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1461.
1973 Ed., § 1-1181.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Conflict of Interest Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-43, November 24, 2007, law notification 55 DCR 2).

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Conflict of Interest Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-73, July 26, 2007, 54 DCR 7547).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Conflict of Interest Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-154, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10913).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).